Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2237
Intravenous therapy; requirements.

(1) A licensed practical nurse may provide intravenous therapy if he or she (a) holds a valid license issued before May 1, 2016, by the department pursuant to the Licensed Practical Nurse-Certified Practice Act as such act existed on such date, (b) graduates from an approved program of practical nursing on or after May 1, 2016, or (c) holds a valid license as a licensed practical nurse issued on or before May 1, 2016, and completes, within five years after August 24, 2017, (i) an eight-hour didactic course in intravenous therapy which shall include, but not be limited to, peripheral intravenous lines, central lines, and legal aspects of intravenous therapy and (ii) an approved employer-specific intravenous therapy skills course.

(2) This section does not require a licensed practical nurse who does not provide intravenous therapy in the course of employment to complete the course described in subdivision (1)(c)(ii) of this section.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 69.